Utah statutes.
31A-22-303.   Motor vehicle liability coverage.
(1) (a)  In addition to complying with the requirements of Chapter 21,
Insurance Contracts in General, and Chapter 22, Part 2, Liability Insurance in
General, a policy of motor vehicle liability coverage under Subsection
31A-22-302(1)(a) shall:
(i)  name the motor vehicle owner or operator in whose name the policy was
purchased, state that named insured's address, the coverage afforded, the
premium charged, the policy period, and the limits of liability;
(ii) (A)  if it is an owner's policy, designate by appropriate reference all
the motor vehicles on which coverage is granted, insure the person named in
the policy, insure any other person using any named motor vehicle with the
express or implied permission of the named insured, and, except as provided in
Subsection (7), insure any person included in Subsection (1)(a)(iii) against
loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of these motor vehicles within the United
States and Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs, for each
motor vehicle, in amounts not less than the minimum limits specified under
Section 31A-22-304; or
(B)  if it is an operator's policy, insure the person named as insured against
loss from the liability imposed upon him by law for damages arising out of the
insured's use of any motor vehicle not owned by him, within the same
territorial limits and with the same limits of liability as in an owner's
policy under Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(A);
(iii)  except as provided in Subsection (7), insure persons related to the
named insured by blood, marriage, adoption, or guardianship who are residents
of the named insured's household, including those who usually make their home
in the same household but temporarily live elsewhere, to the same extent as
the named insured;
(iv)  where a claim is brought by the named insured or a person described in
Subsection (1)(a)(iii), the available coverage of the policy may not be
reduced or stepped-down because:
(A)  a permissive user driving a covered motor vehicle is at fault in causing
an accident; or
(B)  the named insured or any of the persons described in this Subsection
(1)(a)(iii) driving a covered motor vehicle is at fault in causing an
accident; and
(v)  cover damages or injury resulting from a covered driver of a motor
vehicle who is stricken by an unforeseeable paralysis, seizure, or other
unconscious condition and who is not reasonably aware that paralysis, seizure,
or other unconscious condition is about to occur to the extent that a person
of ordinary prudence would not attempt to continue driving.
(b)  The driver's liability under Subsection (1)(a)(v) is limited to the
insurance coverage.
(c) (i)  "Guardianship" under Subsection (1)(a)(iii) includes the relationship
between a foster parent and a minor who is in the legal custody of the
Division of Child and Family Services if:
(A)  the minor resides in a foster home, as defined in Section 62A-2-101, with
a foster parent who is the named insured; and
(B)  the foster parent has signed to be jointly and severally liable for
compensatory damages caused by the minor's operation of a motor vehicle in
accordance with Section 53-3-211.
(ii)  "Guardianship" as defined under this Subsection (1)(c) ceases to exist
when a minor described in Subsection (1)(c)(i)(A) is no longer a resident of
the named insured's household.
(2) (a)  A policy containing motor vehicle liability coverage under Subsection
31A-22-302(1)(a) may:
(i)  provide for the prorating of the insurance under that policy with other
valid and collectible insurance;
(ii)  grant any lawful coverage in addition to the required motor vehicle
liability coverage;
(iii)  if the policy is issued to a person other than a motor vehicle
business, limit the coverage afforded to a motor vehicle business or its
officers, agents, or employees to the minimum limits under Section 31A-22-304,
and to those instances when there is no other valid and collectible insurance
with at least those limits, whether the other insurance is primary, excess, or
contingent; and
(iv)  if issued to a motor vehicle business, restrict coverage afforded to
anyone other than the motor vehicle business or its officers, agents, or
employees to the minimum limits under Section 31A-22-304, and to those
instances when there is no other valid and collectible insurance with at least
those limits, whether the other insurance is primary, excess, or contingent.
(b) (i)  The liability insurance coverage of a permissive user of a motor
vehicle owned by a motor vehicle business shall be primary coverage.
(ii)  The liability insurance coverage of a motor vehicle business shall be
secondary to the liability insurance coverage of a permissive user as
specified under Subsection (2)(b)(i).
(3)  Motor vehicle liability coverage need not insure any liability:
(a)  under any workers' compensation law under Title 34A, Utah Labor Code;
(b)  resulting from bodily injury to or death of an employee of the named
insured, other than a domestic employee, while engaged in the employment of
the insured, or while engaged in the operation, maintenance, or repair of a
designated vehicle; or
(c)  resulting from damage to property owned by, rented to, bailed to, or
transported by the insured.
(4)  An insurance carrier providing motor vehicle liability coverage has the
right to settle any claim covered by the policy, and if the settlement is made
in good faith, the amount of the settlement is deductible from the limits of
liability specified under Section 31A-22-304.
(5)  A policy containing motor vehicle liability coverage imposes on the
insurer the duty to defend, in good faith, any person insured under the policy
against any claim or suit seeking damages which would be payable under the
policy.
(6) (a)  If a policy containing motor vehicle liability coverage provides an
insurer with the defense of lack of cooperation on the part of the insured,
that defense is not effective against a third person making a claim against
the insurer, unless there was collusion between the third person and the
insured.
(b)  If the defense of lack of cooperation is not effective against the
claimant, after payment, the insurer is subrogated to the injured person's
claim against the insured to the extent of the payment and is entitled to
reimbursement by the insured after the injured third person has been made
whole with respect to the claim against the insured.
(7)  A policy of motor vehicle liability coverage under Subsection
31A-22-302(1) may specifically exclude from coverage a person who is a
resident of the named insured's household, including a person who usually
makes his home in the same household but temporarily lives elsewhere, if:
(a)  at the time of the proposed exclusion, each person excluded from coverage
satisfies the owner's or operator's security requirement of Section
41-12a-301, independently of the named insured's proof of owner's or
operator's security;
(b)  the named insured and the person excluded from coverage each provide
written consent to the exclusion; and
(c)  the insurer includes the name of each person excluded from coverage in
the evidence of insurance provided to an additional insured or loss payee.
(8)  A policy of motor vehicle liability coverage may limit coverage to the
policy minimum limits under Section 31A-22-304 if the insured motor vehicle is
operated by a person who has consumed any alcohol or any illegal drug or
illegal substance if the policy or a specifically reduced premium was extended
to the insured upon express written declaration executed by the insured that
the insured motor vehicle would not be so operated.
(9) (a)  When a claim is brought exclusively by a named insured or a person
described in Subsection (1)(a)(iii) and asserted exclusively against a named
insured or an individual described in Subsection (1)(a)(iii), the claimant may
elect to resolve the claim:
(i)  by submitting the claim to binding arbitration; or
(ii)  through litigation.
(b)  Once the claimant has elected to commence litigation under Subsection
(9)(a)(ii), the claimant may not elect to resolve the claim through binding
arbitration under this section without the written consent of both parties and
the defendant's liability insurer.
(c) (i)  Unless otherwise agreed on in writing by the parties, a claim that is
submitted to binding arbitration under Subsection (9)(a)(i) shall be resolved
by a panel of three arbitrators.
(ii)  Unless otherwise agreed on in writing by the parties, each party shall
select an arbitrator.  The arbitrators selected by the parties shall select a
third arbitrator.
(d)  Unless otherwise agreed on in writing by the parties, each party will pay
the fees and costs of the arbitrator that party selects.  Both parties shall
share equally the fees and costs of the third arbitrator.
(e)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, an arbitration procedure
conducted under this section shall be governed by Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah
Uniform Arbitration Act, unless otherwise agreed on in writing by the parties.
(f) (i)  Discovery shall be conducted in accordance with Rules 26b through 36,
Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.
(ii)  All issues of discovery shall be resolved by the arbitration panel.
(g)  A written decision of two of the three arbitrators shall constitute a
final decision of the arbitration panel.
(h)  Prior to the rendering of the arbitration award:
(i)  the existence of a liability insurance policy may be disclosed to the
arbitration panel; and
(ii)  the amount of all applicable liability insurance policy limits may not
be disclosed to the arbitration panel.
(i)  The amount of the arbitration award may not exceed the liability limits
of all the defendant's applicable liability insurance policies, including
applicable liability umbrella policies.  If the initial arbitration award
exceeds the liability limits of all applicable liability insurance policies,
the arbitration award shall be reduced to an amount equal to the liability
limits of all applicable liability insurance policies.
(j)  The arbitration award is the final resolution of all claims between the
parties unless the award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue
means.
(k)  If the arbitration panel finds that the action was not brought, pursued,
or defended in good faith, the arbitration panel may award reasonable fees and
costs against the party that failed to bring, pursue, or defend the claim in
good faith.
(l)  Nothing in this section is intended to limit any claim under any other
portion of an applicable insurance policy.
(10)  An at-fault driver or an insurer issuing a policy of insurance under
this part that is covering an at-fault driver may not reduce compensation to
an injured party based on the injured party not being covered by a policy of
insurance that provides personal injury protection coverage under Sections
31A-22-306 through 31A-22-309.
